Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 1

Services to Children Generally

33-8-101. Applicability of title to children.

Services for children who have serious emotional disturbance, mental illness, or developmental disabilities are governed by all of this title. The general assembly finds that supporting families in their role as primary care givers for their children is more humane, efficient, and cost effective than placing children in state custody to obtain necessary services or otherwise placing children in settings outside their homes.

For children covered by this title, the following service principles are fundamental to carrying out the responsibilities of service providers and advocates:

Families and children are most responsible for determining their needs and should be included appropriately in planning and providing service and support;

Families should receive the support they need to care for their children at home;

Service providers and advocates should enable families and children to make good decisions concerning necessary, desirable, and appropriate services;

Service providers should coordinate services among agencies likely to provide services and supports to children and families;

Service providers and advocates should participate in development of interagency agreements under § 33-1-308 to assure consideration of the needs and problems of children and families; and

Service providers should achieve smooth transitions in services and supports as children grow through various stages of development and become vested in making decisions for themselves, including the transition into adulthood.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Prior to the deletion and replacement of chapter 8 in the revision of title 33, by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001, former chapter 8, parts 1-5, were transferred to title 68, ch. 24, parts 1-5, respectively, in 1993. See the Compiler's Notes under § 68-24-101.

33-8-102. Responsibilities of department with regard to children.

The department in coordination with the council on children's mental health care shall promote effective advocacy for services and supports for all children with serious emotional disturbance, mental illness, or developmental disabilities. The department's responsibilities for children shall include, but not be limited to:

Promoting collaboration among care givers and service providers and equitable involvement of care givers in service plan development;

Case finding after the department has adopted rules regarding service and support to children;

Determining eligibility;

Providing basic service standards;

Facilitating the interdepartmental planning process for children through the statewide and regional planning and policy councils;

Initiating meetings or other processes to develop local interagency agreements as needs and problems are identified by service providers, advocates, or families;

Assisting children and their families to gain access to the system of services and supports;

Defining and listing an array of services and supports; and

Assisting youth who have been in the public system of care with transition to adult services.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2008, ch. 1062, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding to the mental health needs of Tennessee's children and youth, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1062.

33-8-103. Children as priority population.

Children with serious emotional disturbances are a priority population for the department's mental health services and supports. Children with developmental disabilities are a priority population for the department's developmental disabilities services and supports. The department shall set the array of services and supports for these priority populations annually in its plan. The state will fund and the department will maintain the array of services and supports for persons in this priority population. Consistent with applicable eligibility requirements, the state may provide the funding for the services through the medicaid program or any waiver granted under the medicaid program, specifically including TennCare, other public funds, or private funds.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-8-104. Emancipated children — Rights and responsibilities under this title.

Children who are emancipated by marriage, court order, or in any other way recognized by law in the state have all the rights and responsibilities of adults under this title, except to the extent those rights are restricted by court order. The parent of an emancipated child shall be treated as the parent of an adult under all provisions of this title that give parents rights or responsibilities with respect to the child.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-8-105. Interagency plans for transition to adult services.

Mental health and developmental disabilities service providers shall prepare interagency plans to assure that persons seventeen (17) years of age in state custody who will continue to need services and supports in adulthood can make a smooth transition to adult services. The plan should take into account the requirements of other state and federal laws with respect to service. If necessary to avoid delays in service during the transition into adult services, plans shall be prepared before the persons become seventeen (17) years of age.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-8-106. Interagency agreements — Cooperation of service providers with department.

Service providers shall inform the department and the council on children's mental health care of needs or problems of children and families that may be addressed by local interagency agreements with the goals set in § 33-1-308 for state interagency agreements. Service providers shall participate in processes initiated by the department and the council on children's mental health care or others to address the needs or problems.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2008, ch. 1062, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding to the mental health needs of Tennessee's children and youth, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1062.